District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
31 act may be cited as the “Fairness and Accountability in Initiative Reform Amendment Act of
32 2026”.
33 Sec. 2. Section 16 of the District of Columbia Election Code of 1955, approved August
34 12, 1955 (69 Stat. 699, D.C. Official Code § 1-1001.16), is amended as follows:
1

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
35 (a) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
36 (1) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
37 (A) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and
38 inserting a semicolon in its place.
39 (B) Subparagraph (D) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
40 phrase “; or” in its place.
41 (C) A new subparagraph (E) is added to read as follows:
42 “(E) If a proposed initiative measure, the measure addresses more than one
43 subject. For the purposes of this subsection, a measure addresses more than one subject if the
44 measure contains provisions that are sufficiently separable such that the provisions, when
45 separated, can be reasonably considered on their own merits by a voter without reference to the
46 measure’s other provisions.”.
47 (2) Paragraph (1A) is amended as follows:
48 (A) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the period and adding the
49 phrase “. The Board shall post an advisory opinion it receives pursuant to this paragraph on its
50 website for at least 3 years following receipt of the advisory opinion.” in its place.
51 (B) Subparagraph (B)(i) is amended by striking the number “15” and
52 inserting the number “30” in its place.
53 (C) A new subparagraph (C) is added to read as follows:
2

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
54 “(C) If the measure is a proposed initiative measure, within one business
55 day after the proposed measure is received by the Board, the Board shall request a fiscal impact
56 statement from the Office of the Chief Financial Officer, which shall issue a fiscal impact
57 statement that conforms to the requirements of section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures
58 Act of 1975, approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a),
59 within 15 business days after receipt of the request from the Board. The Board shall post the
60 fiscal impact statement on its website for a period of at least 3 years.”.
61 (3) A new paragraph (1B) is added to read as follows:
62 “(1B) Within 5 business days after the proposed measure is received by the
63 Board, the Board shall:
64 “(A) Post on its website the full text of the proposed measure;
65 “(B) Accept public comments on the measure, including comments
66 submitted electronically, and publish comments within one day after receipt on its website,
67 which the Board shall maintain on the website for a period of at least 3 years; and
68 “(C) Post on its website the verified statement of contributions that the
69 proposer filed with the Director of Campaign Finance.”.
70 (4) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “accept a measure” and
71 inserting the phrase “accept a referendum measure” in its place.
72 (5) Paragraph (3) is amended to read as follows:
3

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
73 “(3)(A) If the Board refuses to accept a proposed referendum measure submitted
74 to it, the person or persons submitting such measure may apply, within 10 days after the Board’s
75 refusal to accept such measure, to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for a writ in the
76 nature of mandamus to compel the Board to accept such measure.
77 “(B) If the Superior Court of the District of Columbia determines that the
78 issue presented by the measure is a proper subject of a referendum under the terms of title IV of
79 the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, and that the measure is legal in form, does not
80 authorize discrimination as prescribed in paragraph (1)(C) of this subsection, and would not
81 negate or limit an act of the Council of the District of Columbia as prescribed in paragraph
82 (1)(D) of this subsection, it shall issue an order requiring the Board to accept the measure.
83 Should the Superior Court of the District of Columbia hold in favor of the proposer, it may
84 award court costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees to the proposer.
85 “(C) The Superior Court shall expedite consideration of the matter.”.
86 (6) A new paragraph (3A) is added to read as follows:
87 “(3A)(A) If the measure is an initiative measure, the Board shall convene a public
88 meeting to vote on a written determination accepting or refusing the measure. The meeting shall
89 be held at least 30 days but no more than 60 days after the proposed measure is received. Notice
90 of the meeting and full text of the proposed measure shall be published in the District of
91 Columbia Register at least 15 days in advance of the meeting.
4

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
92 “(B) The Board’s determination shall indicate the grounds for its
93 acceptance or refusal and shall take into consideration the advisory opinions of the Attorney
94 General and the General Counsel to the Council.
95 “(C) Within one day after the public meeting at which the Board voted on
96 its determination, the Board shall transmit its determination to the proposer and post the
97 determination on the Board’s website. The determination shall be published in the District of
98 Columbia Register within 30 days after the public meeting at which the Board voted on the
99 determination.
100 “(D)(i) If the Board accepts a proposed initiative measure, a registered
101 qualified elector of the District of Columbia who objects to the Board’s acceptance of the
102 measure may apply, any time following posting of the written determination on the Board’s
103 website but not more than 30 calendar days after the date the Board publishes its determination
104 in the District of Columbia Register, to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for a writ
105 in the nature of mandamus to compel the Board to refuse to accept such measure.
106 “(ii) If the Board refuses to accept a proposed initiative measure,
107 the person or persons submitting such measure may apply, at any time following posting of the
108 written determination on the Board’s website but not more than 30 calendar days after the date
109 the Board publishes its determination in the District of Columbia Register, to the Superior Court
110 of the District of Columbia for a writ in the nature of mandamus to compel the Board to accept
111 such measure.
5

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
112 “(iii) The Superior Court of the District of Columbia shall
113 determine whether the issue presented by the proposed initiative is a proper subject of initiative
114 under the terms of title IV of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, the measure is legal in
115 form, authorizes discrimination as prescribed in paragraph (1)(C) of this subsection, would
116 negate or limit an act of the Council of the District of Columbia, as prescribed in paragraph
117 (1)(D) of this subsection, and addresses more than one subject as prescribed in paragraph (1)(E)
118 of this subsection, and issue an appropriate order affirming or reversing the Board’s
119 determination and directing the Board to accept or refuse the measure. Should the Superior Court
120 of the District of Columbia issue an order directing the Board to accept the measure, it may
121 award court costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees to the proposer.
122 “(iv) If an action is timely filed under this subparagraph, the Board
123 shall suspend further action on the proposed initiative, and deadlines under this section shall
124 otherwise toll until the Superior Court has issued an order on the Board’s determination. The
125 Superior Court shall expedite consideration of the matter.”.
126 (b) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
127 (1) The lead-in language is amended to read as follows:
128 “(c) Within 20 calendar days after the date on which the Board accepts a referendum
129 measure, or within 30 calendar days after the date on which the Board accepts an initiative
130 measure, the Board shall:”
131 (2) Paragraph (4) is amended to read as follows:
6

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
132 “(4) If the measure is an initiative measure, prepare a fiscal impact summary
133 based on the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer. If funds are not sufficient, the
134 fiscal impact summary shall read in substantially the following form:
135 “The District will need to appropriate funds in its annual budget to implement this
136 measure. The estimated amount of additional funding needed to implement this measure is
137 $(AMOUNT) in the first fiscal year and $(AMOUNT) over the four-year financial plan.”.
138 (c) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
139 “(d)(1) After preparing an initiative or referendum measure, the Board shall call a public
140 meeting to adopt the summary statement, short title, legislative form, and, if the measure is a
141 proposed initiative measure, the fiscal impact summary of the measure prepared pursuant to
142 subsection (c) of this section. Notice of the meeting shall be published in the District of
143 Columbia Register in advance of the meeting, and for initiative measures, the meeting shall be
144 convened not more than 30 days after accepting the initiative.
145 “(2) Within 3 business days after adoption, the Board shall:
146 “(A) Provide the proposer of the measure by electronic mail with the
147 adopted summary statement, short title, legislative form, and, if the measure is an initiative
148 measure, the fiscal impact summary;
149 “(B) Submit the summary statement, short title, legislative form, and, if
150 the measure is an initiative measure, the fiscal impact statement and fiscal impact summary, to:
151 “(i) The District of Columbia Register for publication; and
7

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
152 “(ii) At least one newspaper of general circulation in the District;
153 and
154 “(C) Publish the summary statement, short title, legislative form, and, if
155 the measure is an initiative measure, the fiscal impact statement and fiscal impact summary, on
156 the Board's website.”.
157 (d) Subsection (e) is amended to read as follows:
158 “(e)(1)(A) If any registered qualified elector of the District of Columbia objects to the
159 summary statement, short title, legislative form, or fiscal impact summary of the initiative
160 measure formulated by the Board pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) of this section, that person
161 may seek review in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia within 30 calendar days from
162 the date the Board publishes the summary statement, short title, legislative form, and fiscal
163 impact summary in the District of Columbia Register stating objections and requesting
164 appropriate changes. The Superior Court of the District of Columbia shall expedite consideration
165 of the matter.
166 “(B) If any registered qualified elector of the District of Columbia objects
167 to the summary statement, short title, or legislative form of the referendum measure formulated
168 by the Board pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, that person may seek review in the
169 Superior Court of the District of Columbia within 10 calendar days from the date the Board
170 publishes the summary statement, short title, and legislative form on the Board’s website
171 pursuant to subsection (d)(2)(C) of this section stating objections and requesting appropriate
8

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
172 changes. The Superior Court of the District of Columbia shall expedite consideration of this
173 matter.
174 “(2) Should no review in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia be sought
175 as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the proposed summary statement, short title,
176 legislative form, and fiscal impact summary shall be deemed to be accepted.
177 “(3) Should the Superior Court of the District of Columbia hold in favor of the
178 proposer, it may award court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the proposer.”.
179 (e) Subsection (f) is amended as follows:
180 (1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “and legislative form” and
181 inserting the phrase “legislative form, and fiscal impact summary” in its place.
182 (2) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “and full legislative text” and
183 inserting the phrase “full legislative text, and fiscal impact summary” in its place.
184 (f) Subsection (g) is amended as follows:
185 (1) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “and legislative form”
186 and inserting the phrase “legislative form, and fiscal impact summary” in its place.
187 (2) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
188 “(2) A statement that indicates the signatory has read the summary of the
189 measure, requests that the Board hold an election on the initiative or referendum measure, and
190 states the measure’s serial number and short title;”
191 (3) Paragraph (3) is amended to read as follows:
9

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
192 “(3) The text of the official summary and short title, and, if the measure is a
193 proposed initiative, the fiscal impact summary of the measure printed in at least 11-point font on
194 the front of the petition sheet;”.
195 (4) New paragraphs (4) and (5) are added to read as follows:
196 “(4) A notice that the official summary may not capture the full effect of a
197 measure and an indication of where the full legislative text can be accessed; and
198 “(5) The name of the proposer and an indication of where the proposer’s verified
199 statement of contributions can be accessed.”.
200 (g) Subsection (k)(1)(D) is amended by striking the phrase “of this section; or”
201 and inserting the phrase “of this section, or the statements are incomplete; or” in its place.
202 (h) Subsection (l) is amended by striking the phrase “proper statements” and inserting the
203 phrase “proper and complete statements” in its place.
204 (i) Subsection (o)(1) is amended as follows:
205 (1) Strike the word “calendar” and insert the word “business” in its place.
206 (2) Strike the phrase “10 days, including Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays,
207 beginning on the 3rd day” and insert the phrase “10 business days, beginning by the 5th day” in its
208 place.
209 (j) Subsection (q)(1) is amended to read as follows:
10

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
210 “(q)(1) Upon qualification of an initiative measure, the Board shall place on the ballot the
211 serial number of the initiative and its short title, official summary statement, and fiscal impact
212 summary in substantially the following form:
213 “INITIATIVE MEASURE No.
214 “(SHORT TITLE)
215 “(SUMMARY STATEMENT)
216 “(FISCAL IMPACT SUMMARY)
217 “FOR Initiative Measure No.
218 “AGAINST Initiative Measure No.”.
219 (m) A new subsection (t) is added to read as follows:
220 “(t) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Board shall post all notices required
221 to be published in the District of Columbia Register pursuant to this section on its website
222 contemporaneously with their publication in the District of Columbia Register.”.
223 Sec. 3. Section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved October
224 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a), is amended as follows:
225 (a) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
226 “(a-1) Initiatives. —. Consistent with section 16 of the District of Columbia Election
227 Code of 1955, approved August 12, 1955 (69 Stat. 699, D.C. Official Code § 1-1001.16), a
228 proposed initiative measure shall be accompanied by a fiscal impact statement, which shall
11

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
229 reflect the contents described in subsection (a)(2) of this section for each of the first four fiscal
230 years in which the initiative is in effect.”.
231 (b) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “Permanent and emergency acts”
232 and inserting the phrase “Permanent acts, including initiatives, and emergency acts” in its place.
233 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
234 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
235 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
236 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
237 Sec. 5. Effective date.
238 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
239 the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of Congressional
240 review as provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
241 December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02(c)(l)).
12